Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2018YH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 215 Section 1. Section 256.9, subsection 46, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Develop and make available to school districts, examples 3 of age-appropriate and research-based materials and lists 4 of resources which parents may use to teach their children 5 to recognize unwanted physical and verbal sexual advances, 6 to not make unwanted physical and verbal sexual advances, 7 to effectively reject unwanted sexual advances, that it is 8 wrong to take advantage of or exploit another person, about 9 the dangers of sexual exploitation by means of the internet 10 including specific strategies to help students protect 11 themselves and their personally identifiable information 12 from such exploitation, and about counseling, medical, and 13 legal resources available to survivors of sexual abuse and 14 sexual assault, including resources for escaping violent 15 relationships. The materials and resources shall cover verbal, 16 physical, and visual sexual harassment, including nonconsensual 17 sexual advances, and nonconsensual physical sexual contact , 18 and child sexual abuse and child sexual assault awareness and 19 prevention . In developing the materials and resource list, the 20 director shall consult with entities that shall include but 21 not be limited to the departments of health and human services 22 and public safety, education stakeholders, and parent-teacher 23 organizations. School districts shall provide age-appropriate 24 and research-based materials and a list of available community 25 and internet-based resources to parents at registration and 26 shall also include the age-appropriate and research-based 27 materials and resource list in the student handbook. School 28 districts are encouraged to work with their communities to 29 provide voluntary parent education sessions to provide parents 30 with the skills and appropriate strategies to teach their 31 children as described in this subsection . School districts 32 shall incorporate the age-appropriate and research-based 33 materials into relevant curricula and shall reinforce the 34 importance of preventive measures when reasonable with parents 35 -1- LSB 2018YH (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 H.F. 215 and students. 1 Sec. 2. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 2 following new subsection: 3 NEW SUBSECTION . 69. Develop and distribute to school 4 districts, accredited nonpublic schools, charter schools, and 5 innovation zone schools model guidelines related to how to 6 best provide instruction to students enrolled in kindergarten 7 through grade six in child sexual abuse and child sexual abuse 8 awareness and prevention. The model guidelines must provide 9 guidance related to how to do all of the following: 10 a. Educate students on child sexual abuse prevention using 11 various methods, including discussions, activities, books, and 12 guest speakers. 13 b. Give students the knowledge and encouragement to speak up 14 and alert someone if any person has ever touched the student 15 inappropriately. 16 c. Educate students on safe touch, unsafe touch, safe 17 secrets, and unsafe secrets. 18 d. Educate students on how to get away from an abuser and 19 report an incident immediately. 20 Sec. 3. Section 256.146, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 21 following new subsection: 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 28. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 23 establishing continuing education requirements for renewal 24 of a license, certificate, authorization, or statement of 25 recognition. Continuing education activities may include 26 participating in or presenting at in-service training programs 27 related to child sexual abuse and child sexual assault 28 awareness and prevention. 29 Sec. 4. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 30 by adding the following new paragraph: 31 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0k. Be subject to and comply with the 32 requirements of section 280.36 relating to instruction 33 regarding child sexual abuse and child sexual assault awareness 34 and prevention provided to students enrolled in kindergarten 35 -2- LSB 2018YH (1) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 H.F. 215 through grade six in the same manner as a school district. 1 Sec. 5. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 2 by adding the following new paragraph: 3 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 4 requirements of section 280.36 relating to instruction 5 regarding child sexual abuse and child sexual assault awareness 6 and prevention provided to students enrolled in kindergarten 7 through grade six in the same manner as a school district. 8 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 280.36 Instruction related to child 9 sexual abuse. 10 The board of directors of each school district and the 11 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school shall 12 provide instruction related to child sexual abuse and child 13 sexual assault awareness and prevention that is consistent with 14 the model guidelines developed and distributed by the director 15 of the department of education pursuant to section 256.9, 16 subsection 69, to students enrolled in kindergarten through 17 grade six. 18 Sec. 7. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 19 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 20 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 21 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 22 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 23 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 24 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 25 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 26 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 27 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 28 districts. 29